Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men is established in the office of the governor. In carrying out its duties under this chapter, the commission's areas of focus are limited to only the following: Mental and physical health; education and skills; means of livelihood, careers, and financial well-being; fatherhood, family, and relationships; evaluating the causes of the preschool to prison pipeline and developing prevention strategies; and the experiences of boys and men in other court systems.(2) The commission shall be administered by an executive director who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The governor shall set the salary of the executive director. The executive director shall employ the staff of the commission.(3) Pertaining to the focus areas described in subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the commission shall:(a) Monitor state legislation, and advocate for legislation which may positively impact boys and men;(b) Work with state agencies to assess programs and policies that affect boys and men;(c) Coordinate and collaborate with the women's commission, LGBTQ commission, human rights commission, commission on African American affairs, commission on Hispanic affairs, commission on Asian Pacific American affairs, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and other entities to address issues of mutual concern;(d) Work as a liaison between the public and private sector to improve the well-being of boys and men; and(e) Maintain a list of eligible nominees for membership on the commission who have demonstrated expertise and interest in the well-being of boys and men, and nominate such individuals for consideration.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men shall consist of 11 nonlegislative voting members. The speaker of the house of representatives and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall each appoint two nonlegislative members to the commission. The president of the senate and the minority leader of the senate shall each appoint two nonlegislative members to the commission. The governor shall appoint three nonlegislative members to the commission, with the advice and consent of the senate. In making such appointments, all appointing authorities shall give due consideration to nominations submitted by the executive director.(2) The appointing authorities may only appoint members who have demonstrated an understanding of at least one of the focus areas described under section 1(1) of this act as it applies to issues impacting the well-being of boys and men.(3) The appointing authorities shall ensure representation of diverse perspectives among the commissioners, based upon maintaining a balanced and diverse distribution of ethnic, geographic, gender, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, and occupational representation, where practicable.(4) At the commission's first meeting, each appointed voting member shall draw lots to determine the length of time they will serve on the commission. Of the persons initially appointed to the commission, four members shall serve one year, four shall serve two years, and three shall serve three years. Upon expiration of such terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years. Any vacancies occurring in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments. In no case may any voting member serve more than three years without formal reappointment by the appropriate appointing authority.(5) Two members of the senate, one from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the president of the senate, and two members of the house of representatives, one from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, shall serve as nonvoting members in an advisory capacity. The appointing authorities shall appoint members who have demonstrated an interest in furthering the purpose of the commission. All legislative advisory members shall serve a two-year term, and the position of any legislative advisory member is vacated whenever such member ceases to be a member of the house from which the member was appointed.(6)(a) Nonlegislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(b) Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.(7) A simple majority of the commission's voting membership constitutes a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men shall have the following duties:(a) Provide a clearinghouse for information regarding state legislation as it relates to the purpose of this chapter;(b) Identify and define specific needs of boys and men, ensuring consideration for data disaggregated by multiple social factors, circumstances, or situations that affect a person's lifestyle and well-being, and provide recommendations for addressing those needs in reports to the legislature and governor under (c) of this subsection and on an ongoing basis;(c) Submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor every two years, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, detailing the commission's activities;(d) Consult with state agencies regarding the effects of agency policies, procedures, practices, laws, and administrative rules on the unique problems and needs of boys and men. The commission shall also advise such state agencies on the development and implementation of comprehensive and coordinated policies, plans, and programs focusing on those problems and needs;(e) Gather data and provide resource and referral information to agencies and the public in order to implement the purpose of this chapter;(f) Hold public hearings to gather input on issues related to the unique problems and needs of boys and men; and(g) Advocate for the removal of legal and social barriers for boys and men.(2) To inform public policy, the commission may consult with nonprofit organizations and faith-based organizations that specialize in or provide services relating to any of the focus areas described in section 1(1) of this act.(3) State agencies shall provide appropriate and reasonable assistance to the commission upon request, including gathering and providing data and information, to carry out the purpose of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are made for the use or benefit of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to their terms and the purpose of this chapter. The commission's executive director shall make a report of such funds received from private sources to the office of financial management on a semiannual basis. Funds received from private sources may not be applied to reduce or substitute for the commission's budget as appropriated by the legislature but shall be applied and expended toward projects and functions authorized by this chapter that were not funded by the legislature.(2) In carrying out its duties, the commission may enter into agreements with public and private institutions, local governments, private industry, community organizations, and other segments of the general public as may be appropriate for the purpose of this chapter.(3) The commission may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW as shall be necessary to implement the purpose of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.--- END ---